North Dakota, session 69, SB2293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsections 7 and 18 of section 19-24.1-01 of the North Dakota
Century Code are amended and reenacted as follows:
7. "Cannabinoid concentrate" means a concentrate or extract obtained by separating
cannabinoids from marijuana by a mechanical, chemical, or other process. A container holding
a cannabinoid concentrate for dispensing may not exceed one gram.
18. "Designated caregiver" means an individual who is at least twenty - one years of age and
agrees to manage the well-being of a registered qualifying patient with respect to the
qualifying patient's medical use of marijuana.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision c of subsection 2 of section 19-24.1-03 of the North
Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
c. An original qualifying patient application for a registry identification card form established
by the department which must include all of the following:
(1) The applicant's name, address, and date of birth.
(2) The name, address, and date of birth of the applicant's proposed designated
caregiver, if any.
(3) A photographic copy of the applicant's North Dakota identification. The North
Dakota identification must be available for inspection and verification upon request
of the department. If the applicant is unable to obtain a current North Dakota
identification due to the applicant's medical condition, the applicant may submit
other department approved documentation. If the applicant is a minor, a certified
copy of a birth record or a photographic copy of the minor's North Dakota
identification is required.
(4) The applicant's or guardian's signature and the date, or in the case of a minor, the
signature of the minor's parent or legal guardian with responsibility for health care
decisions and the date.
(5) A disclosure that possession of a firearm by a person who possesses marijuana
may be a violation of federal law.

S. B. NO. 2293 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2293.
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 3 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 62 Nays 22 Absent 10
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State